District of Columbia statutes.
3-1208.65

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term “general supervision” means that the services of the technician are provided under the direction of a licensed veterinarian, and the veterinarian is accessible and available to the technician via a telephone communication device or on the premises.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 865
as added Mar. 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-96, § 102(q), 61 DCR 1184
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-96 added this section.